Utah statutes.
16-7-5.   Amendments of articles of incorporation.

(1)  A corporation sole formed under this chapter may alter or amend its articles of incorporation.

(2)  An amendment described in Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  be made by the corporation sole;

(b)  be executed by:

(i)  the person who executed the original articles of incorporation; or

(ii)  the successor in office to the person described in Subsection (2)(b)(i);

(c)  specify the name, title, and street address of the person described in Subsection (2)(b); and

(d)  be filed in the same manner as is provided for the filing of the original articles.

(3)  A corporation sole altering or amending its articles of incorporation after May 3, 2004, shall comply with Subsection 16-7-15(1).



Amended by Chapter 16, 2004 General Session

